California, session 20252026, AB542.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 46170 of the Education Code is amended to read:46170. (a) In continuation high schools and continuation education classes, a day of attendance is 180 minutes of attendance, but no pupil shall be credited with more than 15 hours of attendance per school week, proportionately reduced for those school weeks having weekday holidays on which classes are not held.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and any other law, the governing board of a school district that maintains a continuation high school or continuation education classes may offer youth workforce development programs to pupils on one or two weekdays per school week if it ensures that they are otherwise enrolled in at least 15 hours of class attendance per school week. (c) A school district that implements a youth workforce development program for purposes of this section shall establish procedures to track pupil attendance and pupil participation while engaging in a youth workforce development program.(d) (1) For purposes of this section, “youth workforce development program” means a program implemented by a continuation high school or school offering continuation education classes, under the supervision of a certificated employee, which enables pupils to earn either academic credit or an industry certificate while engaging in workplace experiences, or workforce development training, with the goal of providing the pupils with the skills and experience necessary to obtain employment at a livable wage following graduation. A youth workforce development program shall be aligned to pupil skills and in-demand careers and provide pupils with technical training and soft skills. A youth workforce development program shall be offered in partnership with a community college district, adult education program, regional occupational program or center, workforce development program accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, or an organization that offers industry-recognized certifications. School districts are encouraged to give priority to programs that lead to an industry-recognized certificate or credential.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “supervision” means pupil participation in paid or unpaid on-the-job experiences wherein the supervisor of the training site and certificated school personnel share the responsibility for the supervision of on-the-job experiences.